Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.110

Claims for damages.

Following the public hearing on the ordinance to establish a mall any person owning or having any legal or equitable interest in property which might be affected by reason of the establishment of the proposed mall or the board of directors of a mall organization shall, within twenty days of such hearing, file with the city clerk a statement describing the real property as to which the claim is made, the nature of the claimant's interest therein, the nature of the alleged damage thereto and the amount of damages claimed. After the receipt thereof, the corporate authority may negotiate with the affected parties concerning them or deny them.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.110. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 11.]